Rhode Island, session 2025, HB6283.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Chapter 59 of the Public Laws entitled “An Act Establishing the Burrillville
Land Trust” is hereby amended to read as follows:
AN ACT ESTABLISHING THE BURRILLVILLE LAND TRUST
CONSERVANCY
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. The Town Council of Burrillville is hereby authorized to establish the
Burrillville Land Trust Conservancy (hereinafter called the Trust Conservancy), a body politic and
corporate and a public instrumentality. The Trust Conservancy shall have the authority to acquire,
hold, and manage real property and interests therein situated in whole or in part in the Town of
Burrillville, consisting of open, agricultural, or littoral property, including existing and future
wellfields and aquifer recharge areas, fresh water marshes, and adjoining uplands, wildlife habitats,
land providing access to or views of the lakes and ponds, land for bicycling and hiking paths and
for future public recreational use and land for agricultural use. With the exception of property
acquired for public recreational purposes, the Trust Conservancy shall hold all property solely as
open space or for agricultural uses or for whatever purposes as the trustees Conservancy members
may determine.
SECTION 2. The mission of the Burrillville Land Trust Conservancy is to protect the Town
of Burrillville's rural character and natural heritage. This is accomplished by preserving land as
open space through acquisition and conservation easement while maintaining, where possible,

public access to these natural resources.
The trust Conservancy will: preserve open space, protect wetlands, ground and surface
water, farmland, unusual and exemplary natural habitats, historical or cultural places of significance
as well as scenic views through a program of sustained acquisition and stewardship. The Trust
Conservancy will provide public access for recreation and appreciation, and opportunities for
research and natural resources education, where possible, on Land Trust Conservancy properties.
SECTION 3. The management, administration and organization of the Trust Conservancy
shall be by ordinance duly adopted by the Town Council of the Town of Burrillville. Trustees
Conservancy members shall be electors of the Town of Burrillville. No elected official may serve
as a trustee Conservancy member.
SECTION 4. Rules and regulations governing the conduct of Trust Conservancy affairs,
including but not limited to the acquisition and management of its holdings, not inconsistent with
the provisions of this act and the ordinance(s), shall be adopted by the trustees Conservancy
members. The Town Council of the Town of Burrillville shall approve all rules and regulations and
modifications thereof. Any changes or modifications to the rules and regulations shall be approved
by the Town Council. The Town Council shall also have the authority sua sponte to change or
modify rules and regulations of the Trust Conservancy. The Town Council shall hold at least one
(1) public hearing on the proposed changes or modification(s), which shall be advertised in a
publication having general circulation in the Town not less than forty-eight (48) hours prior to the
date and time of the public hearing.
The trustees Conservancy members shall keep accurate records of their meetings and
actions and shall file an annual report with the Town Council not later than sixty (60) calendar days
from June 30. All meetings of the Trust Conservancy shall be open to the public in accordance with
Chapter 46 of Title 42 of the general laws.
SECTION 5. The trust Conservancy shall have the power to:
(a) Purchase, receive by gift, or otherwise acquire fee simple or lesser interests in real
property, including development rights of any kind or any interest in real property consistent with
purposes of this act;
(b) Accept gifts, grants or loans of funds or services from any source, public or private, and
comply, subject to the provisions of this act and town ordinance(s), with any terms and conditions
thereof;
(c) Accept from state and/or federal agencies, loans or grants for use in carrying out the
Trust 's Conservancy’s purposes and enter into agreements with such agencies respecting any such
loans or grants;
LC002817 - Page 2 of 8

(d) With approval of the Town Council, employ counsel, auditors, engineers, appraisers,
private consultants, advisors, secretaries or other personnel needed to perform its duties;
(e) Administer and manage land and interests in land held by it in a manner which allows
public use and enjoyment consistent with the natural and scenic resources thereof, including
conveyance of any such land or interests in land to, and contracts with, nonprofit organizations,
provided such land shall continue to be used in a manner consistent with the purposes of this act
and with the terms of any grant or devise by which such land was acquired by the Trust
Conservancy;
(f) Dispose of all or any portion of its real property or interest therein held by it, whenever
in the opinion of the trustees Conservancy members said lands or properties have become
unsuitable or have ceased to be used for the purpose set forth in this act. Nothing in this subsection
shall be construed to authorize the sale, lease or conveyance of lands or improvements held by the
Trust Conservancy as part of a charitable trust conservancy or acquired by gift or devise for the
public use, whether or not such gift or devise is subject to a condition subsequent or reverter;
(g) Otherwise do all things necessary for the performance of its duties, the fulfillment of
its obligation and the conduct of its business.
SECTION 6. The ordinance establishing the management and administration of the Trust
Conservancy shall set forth the process for receipt, accounting and expenditure of all monetary
assests assets. The fiscal year of the Trust Conservancy shall be July 1 to June 30. The treasurer of
the Town of Burrillville shall prudently invest available assests assets of the fund(s), and all income
thereon shall accrue to the respective fund(s). Upon termination or dissolution of the Trust
Conservancy, the title of all funds and other properties owned by the trust Conservancy which
remain after payment or making provision for payment of all bonds, notes and other obligations of
the trust Conservancy shall vest in the Town of Burrillville which shall manage the lands of the
dissolved trust Conservancy in the open space function for which they were donated or purchased
to the best interest of the purposes of the trust Conservancy. If, in the opinion of the Town Council,
said lands no longer function for the purposes set forth in this act, the town may dispose of those
properties.
SECTION 7. The trust Conservancy and all its revenues, income and real and personal
property used by the Trust for furtherances Conservancy in furtherance of its public purposes, shall
be exempt from taxation and from betterments and special assessments, and the Trust Conservancy
shall not be required to pay any tax, excise or assessment to the state or any of its political
subdivisions.
SECTION 8. Nothing in this act shall affect the eligibility of the Town to acquire property
LC002817 - Page 3 of 8

and receive funds under the general laws or any other state land acquisition program.
SECTION 9. The provisions of this act are severable, and if any provision thereof shall be
held invalid in any circumstances such invalidity shall not affect any other provisions or
circumstances. This act shall be construed in all respects so as to meet all constitutional
requirements. In carrying out the purposes and provisions of this act, all steps shall be taken which
are necessary to meet constitutional requirements whether or not such steps are required by statute.
SECTION 2. Chapter 65 of the Public Laws entitled “An Act Establishing the Burrillville
Land Trust” is hereby amended to read as follows:
AN ACT ESTABLISHING THE BURRILLVILLE LAND TRUST
CONSERVANCY
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. The Town Council of Burrillville is hereby authorized to establish the
Burrillville Land Trust Conservancy (hereinafter called the Trust Conservancy), a body politic and
corporate and a public instrumentality. The Trust Conservancy shall have the authority to acquire,
hold, and manage real property and interests therein situated in whole or in part in the Town of
Burrillville, consisting of open, agricultural, or littoral property, including existing and future
wellfields and aquifer recharge areas, fresh water marshes, and adjoining uplands, wildlife habitats,
land providing access to or views of the lakes and ponds, land for bicycling and hiking paths and
for future public recreational use and land for agricultural use. With the exception of property
acquired for public recreational purposes, the Trust Conservancy shall hold all property solely as
open space or for agricultural uses or for whatever purposes as the trustees Conservancy members
may determine.
SECTION 2. The mission of the Burrillville Land Trust Conservancy is to protect the Town
of Burrillville's rural character and natural heritage. This accomplished by preserving land as open
spacethrough space through acquisition and conservation easement while maintaining, where
possible, public access to these natural resources.
The trust Conservancy will: preserve open space, protect wetlands, ground and surface
water, farmland, unusual and exemplary natural habitats, historical or cultural places of significance
as well as scenic views through a program of sustained acquisition and stewardship. The Trust
Conservancy will provide public access for recreation and appreciation, and opportunities for
research and natural resources education, where possible, on Land Trust Conservancy properties.
SECTION 3. The management, administration and organization of the Trust Conservancy
shall be by ordinance duly adopted by the Town Council of the Town of Burrillville. Trustees
Conservancy members shall be electors of the Town of Burrillville. No elected official may serve
LC002817 - Page 4 of 8

as a trustee Conservancy member.
SECTION 4. Rules and regulations governing the conduct of Trust Conservancy affairs,
including but not limited to the acquisition and management of its holdings, not inconsistent with
the provisions of this act and the ordinance(s), shall be adopted by the trustees Conservancy
members. The Town Council of the Town of Burrillville shall approve all rules and regulations and
modifications thereof. Any changes or modifications to the rules and regulations shall be approved
by the Town Council. The Town Council shall also have the authority sua sponte to change or
modify rules and regulations of the Trust Conservancy. The Town Council shall hold at least one
(1) public hearing on the proposed changes or modification(s), which shall be advertised in a
publication having general circulation in the Town not less than forty-eight (48) hours prior to the
date and time of the public hearing.
The trustees Conservancy members shall keep accurate records of their meetings and
actions and shall file an annual report with the Town Council not later than sixty (60) calendar days
from June 30. All meetings of the Trust Conservancy shall be open to the public in accordance with
Chapter 46 of Title 42 of the general laws.
SECTION 5. The trust Conservancy shall have the power to:
(a) Purchase, receive by gift, or otherwise acquire fee simple or lesser interests in real
property, including development rights of any kind or any interest in real property consistent with
purposes of this act;
(b) Accept gifts, grants or loans of funds or services from any source, public or private, and
comply, subject to the provisions of this act and town ordinance(s), with any terms and conditions
thereof;
(c) Accept from state and/or federal agencies, loans or grants for use in carrying out the
Trust's Conservancy’s purposes and enter into agreements with such agencies respecting any such
loans or grants;
(d) With approval of the Town Council, employ counsel, auditors, engineers, appraisers,
private consultants, advisors, secretaries or other personnel needed to perform its duties;
(e) Administer and manage land and interests in land held by it in a manner which allows
public use and enjoyment consistent with the natural and scenic resources thereof, including
conveyance of any such land or interests in land to, and contracts with, nonprofit organizations,
provided such land shall continue to be used in a manner consistent with the purposes of this act
and with the terms of any grant or devise by which such land was acquired by the Trust
Conservancy;
(f) Dispose of all or any portion of its real property or interest therein held by it, whenever
LC002817 - Page 5 of 8

in the opinion of the trustees Conservancy members said lands or properties have become
unsuitable or have ceased to be used for the purpose set forth in this act. Nothing in this subsection
shall be construed to authorize the sale, lease or conveyance of lands or improvements held by the
Trust Conservancy as part of a charitable trust conservancy or acquired by gift or devise for the
public use, whether or not such gift or devise is subject to a condition subsequent or reverter;
(g) Otherwise do all things necessary for the performance of its duties, the fulfillment of
its obligation and the conduct of its business.
SECTION 6. The ordinance establishing the management and administration of the Trust
Conservancy shall set forth the process for receipt, accounting and expenditure of all monetary
assests assets. The fiscal year of the Trust Conservancy shall be July 1 to June 30. The treasurer of
the Town of Burrillville shall prudently invest available assests assets of the fund(s), and all income
thereon shall accrue to the respective fund(s). Upon termination or dissolution of the Trust
Conservancy, the title of all funds and other properties owned by the trust Conservancy which
remain after payment or making provision for payment of all bonds, notes and other obligations of
the trust Conservancy shall vest in the Town of Burrillville which shall manage the lands of the
dissolved Trust Conservancy in the open space function for which they were donated or purchased
to the best interest of the purposes of the Trust Conservancy. If, in the opinion of the Town Council,
said lands no longer function for the purposes set forth in this act, the town may dispose of those
properties.
SECTION 7. The trust Conservancy and all its revenues, income and real and personal
property used by the Trust for furtherances Conservancy in furtherance of its public purposes, shall
be exempt from taxation and from betterments and special assessments, and the Trust Conservancy
shall not be required to pay any tax, excise or assessment to the state or any of its political
subdivisions.
SECTION 8. Nothing in this act shall affect the eligibility of the Town to acquire property
and receive funds under the general laws or any other state land acquisition program.
SECTION 9. The provisions of this act are severable, and if any provision thereof shall be
held invalid in any circumstances such invalidity shall not affect any other provisions or
circumstances. This act shall be construed in all respects so as to meet all constitutional
requirements. In carrying out the purposes and provisions of this act, all steps shall be taken which
are necessary to meet constitutional requirements whether or not such steps are required by statute.
SECTION 10. This act shall take effect upon passage.
LC002817 - Page 6 of 8

SECTION 3. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC002817
========
LC002817 - Page 7 of 8